Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.
§ 32.1-127.001.
Certain design and construction standards to be incorporated in hospital and nursing home licensure regulations.

Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations pursuant to §

32.1-127

for the licensure of hospitals and nursing homes that shall include minimum standards for the design and construction of hospitals, nursing homes, and certified nursing facilities consistent with the current edition of the Guidelines for Design and Construction of Hospital and Health Care Facilities issued by the American Institute of Architects Academy of Architecture for Health.

History.

2005, cc. 177, 222.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 177 and 222, cl. 1 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2005, cc. 177 and 222, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Constitutionality. —

Commonwealth has authority to promulgate regulations for facilities in which first trimester abortions are performed as well as for providers of first trimester abortions, so long as the regulations adhere to constitutional limitations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ralph K. Smith, Member, Senate of Virginia,
2010 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (8/20/10); Opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 10-012,
(8/20/10).

The Board of Health lacks the authority to impose new design-and-construction standards on pre-existing facilities by promulgating regulations under §

32.1-127

and §

32.1-127.001

.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

The Guidelines for Design and Construction of Hospitals and Outpatient Facilities supersede the Uniform Statewide Building Code when the two conflict.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

The Board does have discretion to determine which sections of the Guidelines should apply to regulated health care facilities that provide abortion services, as long as the regulations are, as required by subsection A of §

32.1-127

, in substantial conformity with the standards of health, hygiene, sanitation, construction and safety as established and recognized by medical and health care professionals. The Board also has the discretion to apply different standards to different types of facilities and to deviate from the exact language of the Guidelines, as long the deviation results in an equivalent level of performance, health and safety are not compromised, and the regulations are in substantial conformity with standards established by health care professionals.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

Building standards. —

The Board of Health lacks the authority to impose new design-and-construction standards on pre-existing facilities by promulgating regulations under §

32.1-127

and §

32.1-127.001

.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

The Guidelines for Design and Construction of Hospitals and Outpatient Facilities supersede the Uniform Statewide Building Code when the two conflict.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

The Board does have discretion to determine which sections of the Guidelines should apply to regulated health care facilities that provide abortion services, as long as the regulations are, as required by subsection A of §

32.1-127

, in substantial conformity with the standards of health, hygiene, sanitation, construction and safety as established and recognized by medical and health care professionals. The Board also has the discretion to apply different standards to different types of facilities and to deviate from the exact language of the Guidelines, as long the deviation results in an equivalent level of performance, health and safety are not compromised, and the regulations are in substantial conformity with standards established by health care professionals.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 15-028, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (5/4/15).

§ 32.1-127.01.
Regulations to authorize certain sanctions and guidelines.

The regulations established pursuant to §

32.1-127

shall authorize the Commissioner to initiate court proceedings against nursing homes and certified nursing facilities, except for facilities or units certified as facilities for individuals with intellectual disability. Such proceedings may be initiated by themselves or in conjunction with the administrative sanctions provided in §

32.1-135

.

The Board shall promulgate guidelines for the Commissioner to determine when the imposition of administrative sanctions or initiation of court proceedings as specified in §

32.1-27.1

, or both, are appropriate in order to ensure prompt correction of violations involving noncompliance with requirements of state or federal law or regulation as discovered on any inspection conducted by the Department of Health pursuant to the provisions of this article or the provisions of Title XVIII or Title XIX of the Social Security Act or as discovered on any inspection conducted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

History.

1989, c. 618; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals with intellectual disability” for “the mentally retarded” at the end of the first sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 32.1-127.1.
Immunity from liability for routine referral for organ and tissue donation.

Any chief administrative officer of a hospital or his designee who administers the routine referral required by §

32.1-127

and any representative of any organ procurement organization or eye or tissue bank who receives notice of a death or imminent death, determines the suitability of the decedent or patient for organ donation, makes contact with the family of a decedent or patient to request the donation of organs, tissues or eyes, or assists or performs the removal of any donated organs, tissues or eyes shall be immune from civil liability for any act, decision, or omission or statement made in accordance with the provisions of §

32.1-127

, the regulations of the Board, and the provisions of the Health Care Financing Administration’s regulations on routine referral and organ donation, unless he was grossly negligent or acted in bad faith or with malicious intent.

History.

1988, cc. 325, 418; 2000, c. 810.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of the Virginia Donor Registry, see §

32.1-292.2

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 810 substituted “administers” for “performs” and substituted “referral” for “contact” near the beginning of the paragraph; substituted “receives notice of a death or imminent death, determines the suitability of the decedent or patient for organ donation, makes contact with the family of a decedent or patient to request” for “requests” near the middle of the paragraph; deleted “and” following “§

32.1-127

”; and inserted “, and the provisions of the Health Care Financing Administration’s regulations on routine referral and organ donation,” near the end of the paragraph.

Law Review.

For article discussing decisions of Virginia courts dealing with state administrative procedures between June 1, 2002 and June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2003).

§ 32.1-127.1:01.
Record storage.

Health records, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

, may be stored by computerized or other electronic process or microfilm, or other photographic, mechanical, or chemical process; however, the stored record shall identify the location of any documents or information that could not be so technologically stored. If the technological storage process creates an unalterable record, the nursing facility, hospital or other licensed health care provider shall not be required to maintain paper copies of health records that have been stored by computerized or other electronic process, microfilm, or other photographic, mechanical, or chemical process. Upon completing such technological storage, paper copies of health records may be destroyed in a manner that preserves the patient’s confidentiality. However, any documents or information that could not be so technologically stored shall be preserved.

Notwithstanding the authority of this section to copy health records in the form of microfilm, prescription dispensing records maintained in or on behalf of any pharmacy registered or permitted in Virginia shall only be stored in compliance with §§ 54.1-3410, 54.1-3411, and 54.1-3412.

History.

1994, c. 390; 1998, c. 470; 2012, c. 336.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 336, in subsection A, substituted “Health records, as defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

,” for “Medical records, as defined in §

42.1-77

” at the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “paper copies of health records” for “paper copies of medical records” in the second and third sentences; and in subsection B, substituted “to copy health records” for “to copy patient records.”

§ 32.1-127.1:02.
Repealed by Acts 1997, c. 682.